Utah statutes.
78B-14-501.   Employer's receipt of income-withholding order of another state.

An income-withholding order issued in another state may be sent by or on behalf of the obligee, or by the support-enforcement agency, to the person defined as the obligor's employer under Title 62A, Chapter 11, Parts 4 and 5, Income Withholding, without first filing a petition or comparable pleading or registering the order with a tribunal of this state.

